Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-1641
Disbursement of funds; sections applicable.

Sections 81-1635 to 81-1641 shall apply to the disbursement of all funds which are subject to sections 81-1635 to 81-1641 except for funds appropriated by Legislative Bill 432, Ninetieth Legislature, First Session, 1987.

Sections 81-1636 and 81-1637 shall not apply to any funds which are the subject of any written agreement or contract entered into prior to April 9, 1987, for the awarding of any funds received by the state from United States v. Exxon Corporation.

Laws 1987, LB 683, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 764, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 172.